Missouri, session 2026, HB1939.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 304.034, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 304.034, to read as follows:
304.034. 1. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the governing body of any
municipality may by resolution or ordinance allow persons to operate golf carts or motorized
wheelchairs upon any street or highway under the governing body's jurisdiction. Golf carts
and motorized wheelchairs shall be operated only on streets and highways that have a
posted speed limit of no more than twenty-five miles per hour, unless the resolution or
ordinance adopted by the municipality specifically authorizes the operation of golf carts
and motorized wheelchairs on streets and highways with a higher speed limit. A golf
cart or motorized wheelchair shall not be operated at any time on any state or federal
highway, but may be operated upon such highway in order to cross a portion of the state
highway system which intersects a municipal street. No golf cart or motorized wheelchair
shall cross any highway at an intersection where the highway being crossed has a posted
speed limit of more than forty-five miles per hour.
2. Golf carts operating on city streets under the provisions of this section shall be
equipped with the following:
(1) At least two headlamps mounted at the same level with at least one on each
side of the front of the vehicle;
(2) At least two tail lamps;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1939 2
(3) At least two rear lamps that when lighted will exhibit a red light plainly
visible from a distance of fifty feet to the rear;
(4) At least electrical or mechanical turn signal devices;
(5) At least one red reflector on each side of the vehicle as far to the rear as
practicable;
(6) At least one red reflector on the rear of the vehicle;
(7) One exterior mirror mounted on the driver's side of the vehicle;
(8) Either one exterior mirror mounted on the passenger's side of the vehicle or
one interior mirror;
(9) Operational brakes;
(10) A horn;
(11) A windshield;
(12) A manufacturer's identification number permanently affixed to the frame
of the vehicle;
(13) Safety belts on both front and rear seats;
(14) Reliable steering apparatus; and
(15) Safe tires.
3. In addition to safety equipment required under subsection 2 of this section,
golf carts operated on city streets [shall be equipped with adequate brakes and] shall meet any
other safety requirements imposed by the governing body.
4. Golf carts are not subject to the registration provisions of chapter 301.
[3.] 5. A person operating a golf cart under this section shall have a valid driver's
license issued under chapter 302.
6. Golf carts shall be subject to the insurance provisions of chapter 303.
7. Unless authorized by the private owner of a sidewalk, golf carts shall not be
operated on sidewalks constructed for pedestrian use or on trails designated for
pedestrians and bicyclists.
8. Where a path for golf carts is designated and available for use that is adjacent
to a highway or street, a person operating a golf cart may, by local ordinance, be
required to use that designated path.
9. A person operating a golf cart shall drive the vehicle as near to the right side
of the roadway as practicable.
10. A person operating or riding in a golf cart shall not be required to wear
protective headgear.

HCS HB 1939 3
11. As used in this section, a "golf cart" means a motor vehicle that is designed and
manufactured for operation on a golf course for sporting or recreational purposes and that is
not capable of exceeding speeds of [twenty] twenty-five miles per hour.
✔